North Dakota, session 69, HB1106.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION - DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION - TRANSIT GRANTS.
There is appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not otherwise
appropriated, the sum of $2,000,000, or so much of the sum as may be necessary, to the department of
transportation for the purpose of providing grants to nonfixed route public transportation providers, for
the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027.

H. B. NO. 1106 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1106.
House Vote: Yeas 81 Nays 4 Absent 9
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 0 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State